Oklahoma, session 2026, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10-119 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


If an accident has caused or requires the separation of a truck


tractor from a trailer, the truck tractor and trailer shall be


considered a combination vehicle as defined in Section 951 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes. Any officer of the Department of


Public Safety or any other political subdivision of this state, when


causing a vehicle to be towed pursuant to Section 955 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, shall record in his or her written report of


the accident that the vehicle requiring wrecker or towing service is


a combination vehicle and is subject to removal by an operator.

Req. No. 254 Page 1


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 951, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 951. As used in Sections 951 through 965 of this title


and Sections 1 966 through 3 968 of this act title:


1. “Wrecker or wrecker vehicle” means any motor vehicle that is


equipped with any device designed to tow another vehicle or


combination of vehicles. The use of the term “wrecker” wrecker or


“wrecker vehicle” wrecker vehicle shall be construed to include a


combination wrecker or combination wrecker vehicle, as defined in


paragraph 2 of this section, unless a specific differentiation is


otherwise described;


2. “Combination wrecker” or “combination wrecker vehicle” means


any wrecker vehicle which is designed and equipped with two separate


and distinct devices to tow simultaneously two or more other


vehicles or combinations of vehicles, whether or not both devices


are in use simultaneously. One of the devices shall allow another


vehicle to be loaded onto and transported upon the wrecker vehicle,


and one of the devices shall allow another vehicle to be attached to


and pulled by the wrecker vehicle;


3. “Tow” or “towing” means the use of a wrecker vehicle to


lift, pull, move, haul or otherwise transport any other vehicle by


means of:


a. attaching the vehicle to and pulling the vehicle with


the wrecker vehicle, or

Req. No. 254 Page 2


b. loading the vehicle onto and transporting the vehicle


upon the wrecker vehicle;


4. “Rollback equipment” means a towing device or equipment upon


which the towed vehicle is loaded and transported, removing the


towed vehicle completely from the surface of the roadway. The term


“rollback equipment” rollback equipment shall include car haulers;


5. “Dolly” means a towing device or equipment which lifts and


suspends one axle of the towed vehicle above the surface of the


roadway;


6. “Wrecker or towing service” means engaging in the business


of or performing the act of towing or offering to tow any vehicle,


except:


a. where the operator owns the towed vehicle and displays


on both sides of the wrecker vehicle in plainly


visible letters not less than two (2) inches in height


the words “NOT FOR HIRE”,


b. where the service is performed by a transporter as


defined in Section 1-181 of this title,


c. where service is performed in conjunction with the


transportation of household goods and property,


d. where the wrecker vehicle is owned or operated by the


United States government, the State of Oklahoma this


state, or any department or political subdivision


thereof, or

Req. No. 254 Page 3


e. where the service is performed by an out-of-state


wrecker service at the request of the vehicle owner or


operator, the vehicle is not involved in a collision,


and is being towed:


(1) in either direction across the border between


Oklahoma and a neighboring state, or


(2) through Oklahoma in transit to another state;


provided, the out-of-state wrecker service shall


comply with all other requirements regarding


interstate commerce as set forth in law;


7. “Combination vehicle” means a truck tractor, as defined in


Section 1-183 of this title, with one or more attached trailers as


defined in Section 1-180 of this title;


8. “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Safety;


8. 9. “Commission” means the Corporation Commission;


9. 10. “Department” means the Department of Public Safety;


10. 11. “Nonconsensual tow” means the transportation of a


vehicle without the consent or knowledge of the vehicle’s owner,


possessor, agent, insurer, lienholder, or any other person in


possession of or in charge of any vehicle and includes the


transportation or towing of the vehicle under lawful circumstances


or necessity for the public interest including removing from the


roadway for public safety or public convenience, or accidents, by


any law enforcement officer or property agent or removal from public

Req. No. 254 Page 4


or private property as a result of abandonment or unauthorized


parking by the property owner, agent, possessor, or other legal


entity for the property owner;


11. 12. “Operator” means any person owning or operating a


wrecker vehicle or wrecker or towing service;


12. 13. “Officer” means any duly authorized law enforcement


officer;


13. 14. “Roadway” means any public street, road, highway or


turnpike or the median, easement or shoulder of a roadway;


14. 15. “Service call” means the act of responding to a request


for service with a wrecker vehicle in which a service is performed;


and


15. 16. “Vehicle” shall:


a. have the same meaning as defined in Section 1-186 of


this title, and


b. for the purposes of this chapter when referring to a


vehicle or combination of vehicles being towed or


stored, include a vessel. The term “vessel” shall


have the same meaning as defined in Section 4002 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-254 MSBB 12/27/2024 12:01:00 PM



Req. No. 254 Page 5